Louisiana, session 2026, HB791.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 3308, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. THE PEOPLE'S A.I. ACT
§3301. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Advertisement" means a written or oral statement, illustration, or
depiction promoting the sale or use of a good or service or designed to increase
interest in a brand, good, or service if that statement, illustration, or depiction is
displayed in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration, including access
to data, between a chatbot provider and the brand, good, or service.
(2)(a) "Affirmative consent" means a clear affirmative act signifying a user's
freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous consent for an act or practice in
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
response to a specific request from a chatbot if all of the following apply with regard
to the request:
(i) The request is provided to the user in a clear and conspicuous standalone
disclosure.
(ii) The request includes a description, written in easy-to-understand
language, of the act or practice for which the user's consent is sought.
(iii) The request is made in a manner reasonably accessible to and usable by
a user with a disability.
(iv) The request is made available to the user in each language in which the
chatbot provider provides a chatbot.
(v) An option to refuse consent is provided and at least as prominent as the
option to give consent and takes the same number of steps or fewer as the option to
give consent.
(b) "Affirmative consent" does not include any of the following:
(i) Acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar document.
(ii) Hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content.
(iii) Agreement obtained through the use of a false, fraudulent, or materially
misleading statement or representation.
(iv) Agreement obtained through the use of a dark pattern.
(v) Inference of consent from the inaction of the user or the user's continued
use of a chatbot provided by the chatbot provider.
(3) "Chatbot" means an artificial intelligence, algorithmic, or automated
system that generates information via text, audio, image, or video in a manner that
simulates interpersonal interaction or conversation.
(4) "Chat log" means input data, an output generated by a chatbot, or a
record of the input data or output data from a user's interaction with a chatbot.
(5) "Chatbot provider" means a person who creates, distributes, or otherwise
makes available a chatbot.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
(6) "Collect" or "collecting" means creating, buying, renting, gathering,
obtaining, receiving, accessing, or otherwise acquiring personal data or input data by
any means through an individual's use of a chatbot.
(7) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated with the
substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making or
choice, including but not limited to any practice the Federal Trade Commission
refers to as a "dark pattern".
(8) "De-identified data" means information that cannot reasonably be used
to infer or derive the identity of an individual or does not identify and is not linked
or reasonably linkable to an individual or a device that identifies or is linked or
reasonably linkable to such individual, regardless of whether the information is
aggregated, if the chatbot provider does all of the following:
(a) Taking such physical, administrative, and technical measures as are
necessary to ensure that the information cannot be used to re-identify any individual
or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual.
(b) Committing publicly in a clear and conspicuous manner to do all of the
following:
(i) Process, retain, or transfer the information solely in a de-identified form
without any reasonable means for re-identification.
(ii) Not attempt to re-identify the information with any individual or device
that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual.
(c) Contractually obligate any entity that receives the information from the
chatbot provider to do all of the following:
(i) Comply with the provisions of this Paragraph or Subsection with respect
to the information.
(ii) Require that the contractual obligations be included in all subsequent
instances in which the data may be received.
(9) "Input data" means information, including text, photos, audio, video, or
files, provided to a chatbot by a user.
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
(10) "Model" means an engineered or machine-based system underlying a
chatbot that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives
how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
(11)(a) "Personal data" means information, including derived data,
inferences, or unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual or a
device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual.
(b) "Personal data" does not include de-identified data or publicly available
information.
(12)(a) "Publicly available information" means information that has been
lawfully made available to the general public from any of the following:
(i) Federal, state, or municipal government records, if the person collecting,
processing, or transferring the information does so in accordance with a restriction
or term of use placed on the information by the relevant government entity.
(ii) Widely distributed media.
(iii) A disclosure to the general public required by federal, state, or local law.
(b) "Publicly available information" does not include any of the following:
(i) An obscene visual depiction as defined in 18 U.S.C. 1460.
(ii) Biometric data.
(iii) Personal data that is created through the combination of personal data
with publicly available information.
(iv) Information collated and combined to create user profiles on publicly
available or subscription-based websites and inferences generated from the
information.
(v) Genetic data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the individual
to whom the information pertains.
(vi) Information made available by a user on a website or online service
made available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, on which the user
has restricted the information to a specific audience.
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
(vii) An intimate image, whether authentic or computer-generated, known
to be nonconsensual.
(13) "Process" or "processing" means an operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data, input data, or
sets of personal data or input data, including the use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
deletion, or modification of the data.
(14)(a) "Profiling" means a process performed on input data or personal data
to detect and classify or designate personality and behavioral characteristics of an
individual.
(b) "Profiling" does not include the process of chat logs for purposes of user
safety or to otherwise comply with this Chapter.
(15)(a) "Sell" means the exchange of personal data or input data for
monetary or other valuable consideration, or an offer of that data or of the use of that
data by the chatbot provider to a third party.
(b) "Sell" does not include any of the following:
(i) Disclosure of personal data or input data to a third party that processes the
data on behalf of the chatbot provider.
(ii) With the user's affirmative consent, disclosure of personal data or input
data where the user affirmatively directs the chatbot provider to disclose the data or
intentionally uses the chatbot provider to interact with a third party.
(iii) Disclosure of personal data that the user intentionally made available to
the general public via a channel of mass media, or did not restrict to a specific
audience.
(16)(a) "Training" means the use of input data to adjust or modify a model.
(b) "Training" does not include any of the following:
(i) Testing to identify risks of harm to a user.
(ii) Adjustments or modifications to address an identified risk of harm to a
user.
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
(iii) An action necessary to comply with this Chapter or otherwise required
by law.
(17) "User" means a natural person, regardless of age.
(18) "Widely distributed media" means information that is available to the
general public, including information from a telephone book or online directory, a
television, internet, or radio program, the news media, or an internet site that is
available to the general public on an unrestricted basis. "Widely distributed media"
does not include an obscene visual depiction as defined in 18 U.S.C. 1460.
§3302. Data privacy; security
A. A chatbot provider shall not do any of the following:
(1) Process personal data other than input data to inform chatbot outputs
unless the processing of personal data is necessary to fulfill an express request made
by a user and that user has provided affirmative consent.
(2) Process a user's chat log for any of the following purposes:
(a) Determining whether to display an advertisement for a product or service
to the user.
(b) Determining a product, service, or category of product or service to
advertise to the user.
(c) Customizing an advertisement or the presentation of an advertisement to
the user.
(3) Process a user's chat log or personal data in any of the following
circumstances:
(a) Without the affirmative consent of the user's parent or legal guardian, if
the chatbot provider knows or should know, based on knowledge fairly implied on
the basis of objective circumstances, that the user is under eighteen years of age.
(b) For training purposes, if the chatbot provider knows or should know,
based on knowledge fairly implied on the basis of objective circumstances, that the
user is under eighteen years of age.
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
(c) For training purposes, for a user eighteen years of age or older, without
first obtaining that user's affirmative consent.
(d) To engage in profiling beyond what is necessary to fulfill an express
request.
(4) Use any classification or designation of a user's personality or behavioral
characteristics created through profiling beyond what is necessary to fulfill an
express request made by a user.
(5) Sell a user's chat logs.
(6) Retain a user's chat log for more than ten years, unless retention is
necessary to comply with this Chapter or as otherwise required by law.
(7) Discriminate against or retaliate against a user, including by denying a
product or service, charging a different price or rate for a product or service, or
providing a lower quality product or service to the user, for refusing to consent to the
use of chat logs or personal data for training purposes.
B. A user has the right to access, at any time, the user's own chat logs that
a chatbot provider has retained in a portable and readily usable format.
(1) Chat logs shall be made available to users in a downloadable,
human-readable, and machine-readable format.
(2) A chatbot provider shall not discriminate against or retaliate against a
user, including by denying a product or service, charging a different price or rate for
a product or service, or providing a lower quality product or service to the user, for
accessing the user's own chat logs.
C. A government entity shall not compel the production of or access to input
data or chat logs from a chatbot provider, except pursuant to a wiretap warrant as
provided by the Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure.
D. A chatbot provider shall develop, implement, and maintain a
comprehensive data security program that contains administrative, technical, and
physical safeguards proportionate to the volume and nature of the personal data and
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
chat logs maintained by the chatbot provider. The program shall be written and made
publicly available on the chatbot provider's website.
§3303. Transparency for users
A.(1) A chatbot provider shall not use any term, letter, or phrase in the
advertising, interface, or outputs of a chatbot that indicates or implies that any output
data is being provided by, endorsed by, or equivalent to those provided by any of the
following:
(a) A licensed healthcare professional.
(b) A licensed legal professional.
(c) A licensed accounting professional.
(d) A certified financial fiduciary or planner.
(e) Another licensed or certified professional in this state.
(2) A chatbot provider shall not make a representation that a user's input data
or chat log is confidential.
(3) A violation of this Subsection is a violation of applicable professional
licensing laws, the Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law,
and false advertising laws.
B.(1) A chatbot provider shall provide clear, conspicuous, and explicit notice
to a user that the user is interacting with a chatbot rather than a human prior to the
chatbot generating an output, every hour thereafter, and each time a user asks the
chatbot whether it is a real person.
(2) This notice shall appear in text in the same language as the one in which
the user is interacting with the chatbot, in a font size easily readable by an average
user, and no smaller than the largest font size of other text appearing on the interface
on which the chatbot is provided.
(3) This notice shall be made accessible to users with disabilities.
(4) This notice shall comply with regulations promulgated by the attorney
general as described in this Chapter.
§3304. Assessments; transparency requirements
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
A. A chatbot provider shall assess its chatbot for risks of harm to a user on
a monthly basis, according to metrics as provided in rules to be promulgated by the
attorney general, and shall mitigate risks of harm as provided in rules to be
promulgated by the attorney general.
B. A chatbot provider shall make information about its chatbot publicly
available on its website on a monthly basis as provided in rules to be promulgated
by the attorney general.
§3305. Rulemaking
A. The attorney general shall promulgate rules or regulations to implement
the provisions of this Chapter, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Describing the form and content of the disclosures required under the
transparency provisions of this Chapter.
(2) Providing an example template for the disclosures required under the
transparency provisions of this Chapter.
(3) Describing risks of harm to a user and the metrics that a chatbot provider
shall use to assess its chatbot for risks of harm to a user under the assessment
provisions of this Chapter.
(4) Identifying and describing categories of information that a chatbot
provider shall make publicly available about its chatbot under the assessment
provisions of this Chapter.
(5) Updating annually the inflation-adjusted damages amount, consistent
with the Consumer Price Index, as provided in the enforcement provisions of this
Chapter.
B. The attorney general may promulgate other rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this Chapter.
§3306. Severability; construction
A. If a provision of this Chapter, or its application to a person or
circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this Chapter and the application of the
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
provision to other persons not similarly situated or to other circumstances is not
affected by that invalidation.
B. Nothing in this Chapter preempts or otherwise affects a right, claim,
remedy, presumption, or defense available at law or in equity, including but not
limited to anti-discrimination, consumer protection, labor, and civil rights laws.
§3307. Liability
A. A chatbot is a product for purposes of product liability actions.
B. A chatbot provider has a duty to ensure that the use of its chatbot does not
cause injury to a user.
C. A chatbot provider is liable for any injury it caused a user through the use
of its chatbot, even if any of the following occur:
(1) The chatbot provider exercised all reasonable care in the design and
distribution of the chatbot.
(2) The chatbot provider did not directly distribute the chatbot to the user or
otherwise enter into a contractual relationship with the user.
§3308. Enforcement
A. The attorney general or a district attorney may bring a civil action against
a chatbot provider that violates this Chapter to do any of the following:
(1) Enjoin the act or practice that is in violation of this Chapter.
(2) Enforce compliance with this Chapter or a rule adopted under this
Chapter.
(3) Obtain damages, civil penalties, restitution, or other remedies on behalf
of the residents of this state.
(4) Obtain reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably
incurred.
B. A violation of the data privacy and security or transparency provisions of
this Chapter constitutes an injury-in-fact to a user.
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-714 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 791
C. A user injured by a violation of the data privacy and security or
transparency provisions of this Chapter may bring a civil action against the chatbot
provider, in which the court may award a prevailing plaintiff any of the following:
(1) Statutory damages, as updated annually by the attorney general, as
follows:
(a) Five thousand dollars per violation, for any violation of the data privacy
and security provisions of this Chapter, or actual damages, whichever is greater.
(b) Five thousand dollars in total for all violations of the transparency
provisions of this Chapter, or actual damages, whichever is greater.
(2) Punitive damages, for reckless and knowing violations.
(3) Injunctive relief.
(4) Declaratory relief.
(5) Reasonable attorney's fees and litigation costs.